Hawaii statutes.
[§342F-33] Research, educational, and
training programs. The director may:

(1) Conduct and supervise research programs for the
purpose of determining the causes, effects, and hazards of excessive noise and
the means whereby noise may be monitored, controlled, or abated;

(2) With the approval of the governor, cooperate
with, and receive money from, the federal government, or any political
subdivision of the State or from private sources for the study and control of
excessive noise; and

(3) Conduct or commission and supervise state
educational and training programs on noise prevention, control, and abatement,
including the preparation and distribution of information relating to excessive
noise and its effect on people. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next